vi: Giải đua đủ điều kiện: 24H Series (Proto); ALMS (cũ); Asian Le Mans Series; ELMS; FIA WEC; Đua xe lịch sử (FIA/ACO lịch sử); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series / Grand-Am (cũ); Giải SRO/Prototype; Track day / không theo tiêu chuẩn thi đấu; Khác
lt-LT: Tinkamos lenktynių serijos: 24H serija (Proto); ALMS (istorinė); Azijos Le Mano serija; ELMS; FIA WEC; Istorinės lenktynės (FIA / ACO istorinės); IMSA WeatherTech; „Rolex“ sportinių automobilių serija / „Grand-Am“ (istorinė); SRO / prototipų serija; Trasos diena / nehomologuota; Kita
nl: Geschikte raceklasse: 24H Series (Proto); ALMS (verouderd); Asian Le Mans Series; ELMS; FIA WEC; Historisch racen (FIA/ACO historic); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series / Grand-Am (verouderd); SRO/Prototype Series; Circuitdag / niet-gehomologeerd; Overige
pl: Kwalifikująca seria wyścigowa: 24H Series (Proto); ALMS (starsze edycje); Asian Le Mans Series; ELMS; FIA WEC; Wyścigi historyczne (historyczne FIA/ACO); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series / Grand-Am (starsze edycje); SRO/Prototype series; Track day / brak homologacji; Inne
zh-CN: 适用赛事系列: 24H 系列赛（原型车）; ALMS（旧版）; 亚洲勒芒系列赛; ELMS; FIA WEC; 经典赛（FIA/ACO 经典）; IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex 跑车系列赛 / Grand-Am（旧版）; SRO/原型车系列赛; 赛道日/未认证; 其他
ko: 참가 자격이 있는 레이스 시리즈: 24H 시리즈(프로토); ALMS(레거시); 아시안 르망 시리즈; ELMS; FIA WEC; 역사적인 레이싱(FIA/ACO 히스토릭); IMSA WeatherTech; 롤렉스 스포츠카 시리즈/Grand-Am(레거시); SRO/프로토타입 시리즈; 트랙 데이/비공인; 기타
da: Kvalificerede løbsserier: 24H Series (Proto); ALMS (ældre); Asian Le Mans Series; ELMS; FIA WEC; Historisk racerløb (FIA/ACO historic); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series / Grand-Am (ældre); SRO/Prototype-serier; Trackday/ikke-homologeret; Andet
th: ซีรีส์การแข่งขันที่มีสิทธิ์: 24H Series (Proto); ALMS (รุ่นเก่า); Asian Le Mans Series; ELMS; FIA WEC; Historic Racing (FIA/ACO Historic); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series / Grand-Am (รุ่นเก่า); ซีรีส์ SRO/รถต้นแบบ; แทร็กเดย์/ไม่มีการรับรอง; อื่นๆ
de: Zulässige Rennserien: 24H Series (Proto); ALMS (frühere); Asian Le Mans Series; ELMS; FIA WEC; Historischer Rennsport (FIA/ACO historisch); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series / Grand-Am (frühere); SRO/Prototypen-Serien; Track Day / nicht homologiert; Sonstige
hr-HR: Serije utrka koje ispunjavaju uvjete: 24H Series (Proto); ALMS (naslijeđeno); Asian Le Mans Series; ELMS; FIA WEC; Povijesne utrke (FIA/ACO povijesne); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series / Grand-Am (naslijeđeno); SRO / Serija prototipa; Track day / nehomologirano; Ostalo
zh-TW: 符合資格的賽事系列: 24 小時耐力系列賽 (Proto); ALMS (舊制); 亞洲勒芒系列賽; 歐洲勒芒系列賽 (ELMS); FIA WEC (世界耐力錦標賽); 歷史賽事 (FIA/ACO 歷史); IMSA WeatherTech; 勞力士跑車系列賽 / Grand-Am (舊制); SRO/原型車系列賽; 賽道日 / 無認證; 其他
ro-RO: Serii de curse eligibile: 24H Series (Proto); ALMS (legacy); Asian Le Mans Series; ELMS; FIA WEC; Curse istorice (istoric FIA/ACO); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series / Grand-Am (legacy); Seria SRO/Prototype; Track day / neomologat; Altele
nb: Kvalifiserte løpsserier: 24H Series (proto); ALMS (eldre); Asian Le Mans Series; ELMS; FIA WEC; Historisk racing (FIA/ACO historisk); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series / Grand-Am (eldre); SRO / Prototype-serie; Banedag / ikke-homologert; Annet
sl-SI: Upravičene serije dirk: 24H Series (Proto); ALMS (starejša različica (legacy)); Asian Le Mans Series; ELMS; FIA WEC; Zgodovinske dirke (zgodovinske FIA/ACO); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series / Grand-Am (starejša različica (legacy)); SRO/serija Prototype; Dirkalni dan / nehomologirano; Drugo
hu: Jogosult versenysorozat: 24H Series (Proto); ALMS (örökölt); Asian Le Mans Series; ELMS; FIA WEC; Történelmi versenyek (FIA/ACO történelmi); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series / Grand-Am (örökölt); SRO/Prototype sorozat; Nyílt pályanap / nem homologizált; Egyéb
es: Serie de carreras elegibles: 24H Series (Proto); ALMS (heredado); Asian Le Mans Series; ELMS; FIA WEC; Carreras históricas (histórico de la FIA/ACO); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series/Grand-Am (heredado); SRO/Prototype series; Día de pista/no homologado; Otro
sk-SK: Séria pretekov, ktorá spĺňa podmienky: 24H Series (Proto); ALMS (staršie); Asian Le Mans Series; ELMS; FIA WEC; Historické preteky (historické FIA/ACO); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series / Grand-Am (staršie); Séria SRO/Prototype; Jazdy na okruhu/nehomologované; Iné
bg-BG: Допустими състезателни серии: 24H Series (Proto); ALMS (наследени); Азиатски серии Льо Ман; ELMS; FIA WEC; Исторически състезания (исторически на FIA/ACO); IMSA WeatherTech; Спортни серии Rolex / Grand-Am (наследени); SRO / прототипни серии; Трак дей / нехомологирани; Други
el: Επιλέξιμες σειρές αγώνων: 24H Series (Proto); ALMS (παλαιού τύπου); Asian Le Mans Series; ELMS; FIA WEC; Ιστορικοί αγώνες (FIA/ACO historic); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series / Grand-Am (παλαιού τύπου); Σειρά SRO/Prototype; Track day / χωρίς έγκριση τύπου; Άλλο
cs: Způsobilé závodní série: 24H Series (Proto); ALMS (starší); Asian Le Mans Series; ELMS; FIA WEC; Historické závody (FIA/ACO historic); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series / Grand-Am (starší); SRO / série prototypů; Track day / nehomologované; Jiné
ja: 対象となるレースシリーズ: 24時間シリーズ (プロト); ALMS (レガシー); アジアン・ル・マン・シリーズ; ELMS; FIA WEC; ヒストリックレーシング (FIA/ACOヒストリック); IMSAウェザーテック; ロレックス・スポーツカー・シリーズ / グランダム (レガシー); SRO/プロトタイプシリーズ; トラックデイ / 非公認; その他
pt-BR: Séries de corridas elegíveis: 24H Series (Proto); ALMS (legado); Asian Le Mans Series; ELMS; FIA WEC; Corridas históricas (histórico FIA/ACO); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series / Grand-Am (legado); SRO/Prototype series; Track day / não homologado; Outro
fr: Séries de course admissibles: 24H Series (Proto); ALMS (hérité); Asian Le Mans Series; ELMS; FIA WEC; Course historique (historique FIA/ACO); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series / Grand-Am (hérité); SRO/Séries prototypes; Journée sur circuit/non homologué; Autre
fi: Kilpailukelpoinen kilpasarja: 24H Series (Proto); ALMS (vanha); Asian Le Mans Series; ELMS; FIA WEC; Historiallinen kilpa-ajo (FIA/ACO historic); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series / Grand-Am (vanha); SRO / Prototype -sarja; Ratapäivä / ei-luokiteltu; Muu
it: Serie di gare ammissibili: 24H Series (Proto); ALMS (legacy); Asian Le Mans Series; ELMS; FIA WEC; Corse storiche (storiche FIA/ACO); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series / Grand-Am (legacy); SRO/Serie prototipi; Track day/non omologata; Altro
pt-PT: Séries de corridas elegíveis: Série 24H (Proto); ALMS (legado); Asian Le Mans Series; ELMS; FIA WEC; Corridas históricas (FIA/ACO historic); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series / Grand-Am (legado); SRO/Prototype Series; Dia de pista/não homologado; Outro
en: Eligible race series: 24H Series (Proto); ALMS (legacy); Asian Le Mans Series; ELMS; FIA WEC; Historic racing (FIA/ACO historic); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series / Grand-Am (legacy); SRO/Prototype series; Track day / non-homologated; Other
ru: Допустимая гоночная серия: Серия 24H (прототипы); ALMS (устаревшее); Азиатская серия Ле-Ман; ELMS; FIA WEC; Исторические гонки (FIA/ACO); IMSA WeatherTech; Серия спорткаров Rolex / Grand-Am (устаревшее); SRO / Серия прототипов; Трек-дни / без омологации; Другое
sv: Kvalificerade tävlingsserier: 24H Series (Proto); ALMS (äldre); Asian Le Mans Series; ELMS; FIA WEC; Historisk racing (FIA/ACO-historisk); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series / Grand-Am (äldre); SRO/Prototype-serien; Trackday / icke-homologerad; Övrigt
tr: Uygun yarış serileri: 24H Series (Proto); ALMS (eski); Asya Le Mans Serisi; ELMS; FIA WEC; Tarihi yarış (FIA/ACO tarihi); IMSA WeatherTech; Rolex Sports Car Series / Grand-Am (eski); SRO/Prototype serisi; Pist günü / homologe edilmemiş; Diğer